Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska87-403
Franchise; sections, applicable; when.

Sections 87-401 to 87-410 apply only to a franchise (1) the performance of which contemplates or requires the franchisee to establish or maintain a place of business within the State of Nebraska, (2) when gross sales of products or services between the franchisor and franchisee covered by such franchise shall have exceeded thirty-five thousand dollars for the twelve months next preceding the institution of suit pursuant to sections 87-401 to 87-410, and (3) when more than twenty percent of the franchisee's gross sales are intended to be or are derived from such franchise.

Laws 1978, LB 202, § 3.